de: Reedstärke: Hart; Medium; Weich; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Liežuvėlio stiprumas: Kietas; Vidutinis; Minkštas; Kita
en: Reed strength: Hard; Medium; Soft; Other
es: Fuerza de la caña: Duro; Medio; Blando; Otros
hr-HR: Čvrstoća trske: Tvrda; Srednja; Meka; Ostalo
zh-CN: 簧片强度: 硬; 媒介; 软; 其他
cs: Síla rákosu: Tvrdá; Médium; Měkká; Jiné
fr: Force du roseau: Difficile; Moyen; Doux; Autre
it: Resistenza dell’ancia: Dura; Medio; Morbida; Altro
fi: Puhaltimen voimakkuus: Kova; Keskimääräinen; Pehmeä; Muu
tr: Kamış gücü: Sert; Orta; Yumuşak; Diğer
vi: Độ bền lưỡi gà: Cứng; Vừa; Mềm; Khác
pt-PT: Resistência da palheta: Duro; Médio; Suave; Outro
pl: Wytrzymałość stroika: Twardy; Środek; Miękki; Inne
ro-RO: Rezistență ancie: Dur; Mediu; Moale; Altele
da: Sivstyrke: Hård; Medium; Blød; Andet
sk-SK: Sila plátku: Tvrdý; Stredný; Mäkký; Iné
bg-BG: Сила на гъдулка: Твърд; Среден; Мек; Други
hu: Fafúvós hangszer erőssége: Kemény; Közepes; Puha; Egyéb
zh-TW: 簧片強度: 硬; 媒介; 柔軟; 其他
nl: Rietsterkte: Hard; Medium; Zacht; Andere
sv: Rörbladsstyrka: Hård; Medium; Mjuk; Övrigt
ja: リードの強度: ハード; 媒体; ソフト; その他
ru: Прочность трубки: Твердый; Средний; Мягкий; Другой
ko: 리드 경도: 하드; 매체; 부드러움; 기타
pt-BR: Resistência da palheta: Duro; Médio; Macio; Outro
nb: Rørstyrke: Hard; Middels; Myk; Annet
th: ความแข็งของลิ้น: แข็ง; สื่อ; นุ่ม; อื่นๆ
el: Αντοχή καλαμιού: Σκληρή; Μέση; Μαλακό; Άλλο
sl-SI: Moč jezička pihala: Močna; Srednja; Rahla; Drugo